Florida, session 2026, SB572.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 43 44 Section 1.âSubsection (21) of section 112.312, Florida 45 Statutes, is amended to read: 46 112.312âDefinitions.âAs used in this part and for purposes 47 of the provisions of s. 8, Art. II of the State Constitution, 48 unless the context otherwise requires: 49 (21)ââRelative,â unless otherwise specified in this part, 50 means an individual who is related to a public officer or 51 employee as father, mother, son, daughter, brother, sister, 52 uncle, aunt, first cousin, nephew, niece, husband, wife, father 53 in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, brother-in 54 law, sister-in-law, stepfather, stepmother, stepson, 55 stepdaughter, stepbrother, stepsister, half brother, half 56 sister, grandparent, great grandparent, grandchild, great 57 grandchild, step grandparent, step great grandparent, step 58 grandchild, or step great grandchild; an individual who, while 59 the public officer or employee was a minor, was his or her 60 legally recognized foster parent in the jurisdiction where the 61 relationship occurred or an individual who is a current or 62 former legally recognized foster child of the public officer or 63 employee in the jurisdiction where the relationship occurs or 64 occurred; a, person who is engaged to be married to the public 65 officer or employee or who otherwise holds himself or herself 66 out as or is generally known as the person whom the public 67 officer or employee intends to marry or with whom the public 68 officer or employee intends to form a household;, or any other 69 natural person having the same legal residence as the public 70 officer or employee. 71 Section 2.âParagraph (c) is added to subsection (2) of 72 section 112.3135, Florida Statutes, to read: 73 112.3135âRestriction on employment of relatives.â 74 (2) 75 (c)âThis subsection does not prohibit the board, council, 76 commission, or collegial body on which an elected public 77 official serves from appointing, employing, promoting, or 78 advancing a relative who is an elected public official serving 79 on the same board, council, commission, or collegial body to a 80 leadership position thereof. 81 Section 3.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 82 made by this act to section 112.312, Florida Statutes, in a 83 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 84 106.07, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 85 106.07âReports; certification and filing.â 86 (4)(a)âExcept for daily reports, to which only the 87 contributions provisions below apply, and except as provided in 88 paragraph (b), each report required by this section must 89 contain: 90 1.âThe full name, address, and occupation, if any, of each 91 person who has made one or more contributions to or for such 92 committee or candidate within the reporting period, together 93 with the amount and date of such contributions. For 94 corporations, the report must provide as clear a description as 95 practicable of the principal type of business conducted by the 96 corporation. However, if the contribution is $100 or less or is 97 from a relative, as defined in s. 112.312, provided that the 98 relationship is reported, the occupation of the contributor or 99 the principal type of business need not be listed. 100 2.âThe name and address of each political committee from 101 which the reporting committee or the candidate received, or to 102 which the reporting committee or candidate made, any transfer of 103 funds, together with the amounts and dates of all transfers. 104 3.âEach loan for campaign purposes to or from any person or 105 political committee within the reporting period, together with 106 the full names, addresses, and occupations, and principal places 107 of business, if any, of the lender and endorsers, if any, and 108 the date and amount of such loans. 109 4.âA statement of each contribution, rebate, refund, or 110 other receipt not otherwise listed under subparagraphs 1. 111 through 3. 112 5.âThe total sums of all loans, in-kind contributions, and 113 other receipts by or for such committee or candidate during the 114 reporting period. The reporting forms shall be designed to 115 elicit separate totals for in-kind contributions, loans, and 116 other receipts. 117 6.âThe full name and address of each person to whom 118 expenditures have been made by or on behalf of the committee or 119 candidate within the reporting period; the amount, date, and 120 purpose of each such expenditure; and the name and address of, 121 and office sought by, each candidate on whose behalf such 122 expenditure was made. However, expenditures made from the petty 123 cash fund provided by s. 106.12 need not be reported 124 individually. 125 7.âThe full name and address of each person to whom an 126 expenditure for personal services, salary, or reimbursement for 127 authorized expenses as provided in s. 106.021(3) has been made 128 and which is not otherwise reported, including the amount, date, 129 and purpose of such expenditure. However, expenditures made from 130 the petty cash fund provided for in s. 106.12 need not be 131 reported individually. Receipts for reimbursement for authorized 132 expenditures shall be retained by the treasurer along with the 133 records for the campaign account. 134 8.âThe total amount withdrawn and the total amount spent 135 for petty cash purposes pursuant to this chapter during the 136 reporting period. 137 9.âThe total sum of expenditures made by such committee or 138 candidate during the reporting period. 139 10.âThe amount and nature of debts and obligations owed by 140 or to the committee or candidate, which relate to the conduct of 141 any political campaign. 142 11.âTransaction information for each credit card purchase. 143 Receipts for each credit card purchase shall be retained by the 144 treasurer with the records for the campaign account. 145 12.âThe amount and nature of any separate interest-bearing 146 accounts or certificates of deposit and identification of the 147 financial institution in which such accounts or certificates of 148 deposit are located. 149 13.âThe primary purposes of an expenditure made indirectly 150 through a campaign treasurer pursuant to s. 106.021(3) for goods 151 and services such as communications media placement or 152 procurement services, campaign signs, insurance, and other 153 expenditures that include multiple components as part of the 154 expenditure. The primary purpose of an expenditure shall be that 155 purpose, including integral and directly related components, 156 that comprises 80 percent of such expenditure. 157 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 158 made by this act to section 112.312, Florida Statutes, in a 159 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 160 106.0702, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 161 106.0702âReporting; political party executive committee 162 candidates.â 163 (4)(a)âEach report required by this section must contain: 164 1.âThe full name, address, and occupation of each person 165 who has made one or more contributions to or for the reporting 166 individual within the reporting period, together with the amount 167 and date of such contributions. For corporations, the report 168 must provide as clear a description as practicable of the 169 principal type of business conducted by the corporations. 170 However, if the contribution is $100 or less or is from a 171 relative, as defined in s. 112.312, provided that the 172 relationship is reported, the occupation of the contributor or 173 the principal type of business need not be listed. 174 2.âThe name and address of each political committee from 175 which the reporting individual has received, or to which the 176 reporting individual has made, any transfer of funds within the 177 reporting period, together with the amounts and dates of all 178 transfers. 179 3.âEach loan for campaign purposes from any person or 180 political committee within the reporting period, together with 181 the full name, address, and occupation, and principal place of 182 business, if any, of the lender and endorser, if any, and the 183 date and amount of such loans. 184 4.âA statement of each contribution, rebate, refund, or 185 other receipt not otherwise listed under subparagraphs 1.-3. 186 5.âThe total sums of all loans, in-kind contributions, and 187 other receipts by or for such reporting individual during the 188 reporting period. The reporting forms shall be designed to 189 elicit separate totals for in-kind contributions, loans, and 190 other receipts. 191 6.âThe full name and address of each person to whom 192 expenditures have been made by or on behalf of the reporting 193 individual within the reporting period; the amount, date, and 194 purpose of each such expenditure; and the name and address of, 195 and office sought by, each reporting individual on whose behalf 196 such expenditure was made. 197 7.âThe amount and nature of debts and obligations owed by 198 or to the reporting individual which relate to the conduct of 199 any political campaign. 200 8.âTransaction information for each credit card purchase. 201 Receipts for each credit card purchase shall be retained by the 202 reporting individual. 203 9.âThe amount and nature of any separate interest-bearing 204 accounts or certificates of deposit and identification of the 205 financial institution in which such accounts or certificates of 206 deposit are located. 207 Section 5.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 208 made by this act to section 112.312, Florida Statutes, in a 209 reference thereto, section 348.0305, Florida Statutes, is 210 reenacted to read: 211 348.0305âEthics requirements.â 212 (1)âNotwithstanding any other provision of law to the 213 contrary, members and employees of the agency are subject to 214 part III of chapter 112. As used in this section, the term: 215 (a)ââAgencyâ means the Greater Miami Expressway Agency. 216 (b)ââLobbyâ means to seek to influence the agency, on 217 behalf of another person, with respect to a decision of the 218 agency in an area of policy or procurement or to attempt to 219 obtain the goodwill of an officer, employee, or consultant of 220 the agency. The term does not include representing a client in 221 any stage of applying for or seeking approval of any 222 administrative action, or opposition to such action, provided 223 such action does not require legislative discretion and is 224 subject to judicial review by petitioning for writ of 225 certiorari. 226 (c)ââLobbyistâ means a person who is employed and receives 227 payment, or who contracts for economic consideration, to lobby 228 or a person who is principally employed for governmental affairs 229 by another person or entity to lobby on behalf of such person or 230 entity. The term does not include a person who: 231 1.âRepresents a client in a judicial proceeding or in a 232 formal administrative proceeding before the agency. 233 2.âIs an officer or employee of any governmental entity 234 acting in the normal course of his or her duties. 235 3.âConsults under contract with the agency and communicates 236 with the agency regarding issues related to the scope of 237 services in his or her contract. 238 4.âIs an expert witness who is retained or employed by an 239 employer, principal, or client to provide only scientific, 240 technical, or other specialized information provided in agenda 241 materials or testimony only in public hearings, provided the 242 expert identifies such employer, principal, or client at such 243 hearing. 244 5.âSeeks to procure a contract that is less than $20,000 or 245 a contract pursuant to s. 287.056. 246 (d)ââOfficerâ means a member of the governing body of the 247 agency. 248 (e)ââPrincipalâ has the same meaning as in s. 112.3215. 249 (f)ââRelativeâ has the same meaning as in s. 112.312. 250 (2)(a)âA lobbyist may not be appointed or serve as a member 251 of the governing body of the agency. 252 (b)âA person may not be appointed or serve as an officer if 253 that person currently represents or has in the previous 4 years 254 lobbied the agency or the former Miami-Dade County Expressway 255 Authority. 256 (c)âA person may not be appointed or serve as an officer if 257 that person has in the previous 4 years done business, or been 258 an employee of a person or entity that has done business, with 259 the agency or the former Miami-Dade County Expressway Authority. 260 (d)âA person may not be appointed or serve as an officer if 261 that person has in the previous 2 years been an employee of the 262 agency. 263 (3)âAn officer, employee, or consultant of the agency or of 264 the former Miami-Dade County Expressway Authority may not, for a 265 period of 4 years after vacation of his or her position with the 266 agency: 267 (a)âLobby the agency. 268 (b)âHave an employment or contractual relationship with a 269 business entity in connection with a contract in which the 270 officer, employee, or consultant personally and substantially 271 participated through decision, approval, disapproval, 272 recommendation, rendering of advice, or investigation while he 273 or she was an officer, employee, or consultant of the agency. 274 When an agency employeeâs position is eliminated and his or her 275 former duties are performed by the business entity, this 276 paragraph does not prohibit him or her from employment or a 277 contractual relationship with the business entity if the 278 employeeâs participation in the contract was limited to 279 recommendation, rendering of advice, or investigation and if the 280 executive director of the agency determines that the best 281 interests of the agency will be served thereby and provides 282 prior written approval for the particular employee. 283 (c)âHave or hold any employment or contractual relationship 284 with a business entity in connection with any contract for 285 contractual services which was within his or her responsibility 286 while an officer, employee, or consultant. If an agency 287 employeeâs position is eliminated and his or her former duties 288 are performed by the business entity, this paragraph may be 289 waived by the executive director of the agency through prior 290 written approval for the particular employee if the executive 291 director determines that the best interests of the agency will 292 be served thereby. 293 (4)âEach officer, employee, and consultant of the agency 294 must promptly disclose: 295 (a)âEvery relationship that may create a conflict between 296 his or her private interests and the performance of his or her 297 duties to the agency or that would impede the full and faithful 298 discharge of his or her duties to the agency. 299 (b)âAny relative and any employment or contractual 300 relationship of such relative which, if held by the officer, 301 employee, or consultant, would violate any provision of s. 302 112.313. 303 (c)âAny relative who is a lobbyist and such lobbyistâs 304 principal. 305 (d)âAny direct or indirect interest in real property and 306 such interest of any relative if such property is located within 307 one-half mile of any actual or prospective agency project. The 308 executive director of the agency shall provide a corridor map 309 and a property ownership list reflecting the ownership of all 310 real property within the disclosure area, or an alignment map 311 with a list of associated owners, to all officers, employees, 312 and consultants. 313 (5)âThe disclosures required under subsection (4) must be 314 filed with the agency general counsel in the manner specified by 315 the general counsel. When the disclosure is filed by the general 316 counsel, a copy must be provided to the executive director of 317 the agency. 318 (6)âA violation of this section shall be considered a 319 violation of the violatorâs official, employment, or contractual 320 duties to the agency. 321 (7)âOfficers, employees, and consultants of the agency 322 shall be adequately informed and trained on the provisions of 323 this section and the state code of ethics and shall receive 324 ongoing ethics training. 325 (8)âThe state code of ethics shall apply to officers, 326 employees, and consultants of the agency, and this section shall 327 be enforced by the Commission on Ethics as part of the state 328 code of ethics. 329 (9)âFor purposes of this section, âconsultantâ does not 330 include firms or individuals retained by the agency to provide 331 architectural, engineering, landscape architecture, or 332 registered surveying and mapping services as described in s. 333 287.055. 334 Section 6.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 335 made by this act to section 112.312, Florida Statutes, in a 336 reference thereto, section 1001.421, Florida Statutes, is 337 reenacted to read: 338 1001.421âGifts.âNotwithstanding any other provision of law 339 to the contrary, district school board members and their 340 relatives, as defined in s. 112.312(21), may not directly or 341 indirectly solicit any gift, or directly or indirectly accept 342 any gift in excess of $50, from any person, vendor, potential 343 vendor, or other entity doing business with the school district. 344 The term âgiftâ has the same meaning as in s. 112.312(12). 345 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 346 made by this act to section 112.3135, Florida Statutes, in a 347 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 348 28.35, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 349 28.35âFlorida Clerks of Court Operations Corporation.â 350 (1) 351 (b)1.âThe executive council shall be composed of eight 352 clerks of the court elected by the clerks of the courts for a 353 term of 2 years, with two clerks from counties with a population 354 of fewer than 100,000, two clerks from counties with a 355 population of at least 100,000 but fewer than 500,000, two 356 clerks from counties with a population of at least 500,000 but 357 fewer than 1 million, and two clerks from counties with a 358 population of 1 million or more. The executive council shall 359 also include, as ex officio members, a designee of the President 360 of the Senate and a designee of the Speaker of the House of 361 Representatives. The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall 362 designate one additional member to represent the state courts 363 system. 364 2.âMembers of the executive council of the corporation are 365 subject to ss. 112.313(1)-(8), (10), (12), and (15); 112.3135; 366 and 112.3143(2). For purposes of applying ss. 112.313(1)-(8), 367 (10), (12), and (15); 112.3135; and 112.3143(2) to activities of 368 executive council members, members shall be considered public 369 officers and the corporation shall be considered the membersâ 370 agency. 371 Section 8.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 372 made by this act to section 112.3135, Florida Statutes, in a 373 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (6) of section 374 288.012, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 375 288.012âState of Florida international offices; direct 376 support organization.âThe Legislature finds that the expansion 377 of international trade and tourism is vital to the overall 378 health and growth of the economy of this state. This expansion 379 is hampered by the lack of technical and business assistance, 380 financial assistance, and information services for businesses in 381 this state. The Legislature finds that these businesses could be 382 assisted by providing these services at State of Florida 383 international offices. The Legislature further finds that the 384 accessibility and provision of services at these offices can be 385 enhanced through cooperative agreements or strategic alliances 386 between private businesses and state, local, and international 387 governmental entities. 388 (6) 389 (d)âThe senior managers and members of the board of 390 directors of the organization are subject to ss. 112.313(1)-(8), 391 (10), (12), and (15); 112.3135; and 112.3143(2). For purposes of 392 applying ss. 112.313(1)-(8), (10), (12), and (15); 112.3135; and 393 112.3143(2) to activities of the president and staff, those 394 persons shall be considered public officers or employees and the 395 corporation shall be considered their agency. The exemption set 396 forth in s. 112.313(12) for advisory boards applies to the 397 members of board of directors. Further, each member of the board 398 of directors who is not otherwise required to file financial 399 disclosures pursuant to s. 8, Art. II of the State Constitution 400 or s. 112.3144, shall file disclosure of financial interests 401 pursuant to s. 112.3145. 402 Section 9.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 403 made by this act to section 112.3135, Florida Statutes, in a 404 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 288.8014, Florida 405 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 406 288.8014âTriumph Gulf Coast, Inc.; organization; board of 407 directors.â 408 (4)âThe Legislature determines that it is in the public 409 interest for the members of the board of directors to be subject 410 to the requirements of ss. 112.313, 112.3135, and 112.3143, 411 notwithstanding the fact that the board members are not public 412 officers or employees. For purposes of those sections, the board 413 members shall be considered to be public officers or employees. 414 In addition to the postemployment restrictions of s. 112.313(9), 415 a person appointed to the board of directors must agree to 416 refrain from having any direct interest in any contract, 417 franchise, privilege, project, program, or other benefit arising 418 from an award by Triumph Gulf Coast, Inc., during the term of 419 his or her appointment and for 6 years after the termination of 420 such appointment. It is a misdemeanor of the first degree, 421 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083, for a person 422 to accept appointment to the board of directors in violation of 423 this subsection or to accept a direct interest in any contract, 424 franchise, privilege, project, program, or other benefit granted 425 by Triumph Gulf Coast, Inc., to an awardee within 6 years after 426 the termination of his or her service on the board. Further, 427 each member of the board of directors who is not otherwise 428 required to file financial disclosure under s. 8, Art. II of the 429 State Constitution or s. 112.3144 shall file disclosure of 430 financial interests under s. 112.3145. 431 Section 10.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 432 made by this act to section 112.3135, Florida Statutes, in a 433 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 434 288.9604, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 435 288.9604âCreation of the corporation.â 436 (3)(a)1.âA director may not receive compensation for his or 437 her services, but is entitled to necessary expenses, including 438 travel expenses, incurred in the discharge of his or her duties. 439 Each appointed director shall hold office until his or her 440 successor has been appointed. 441 2.âDirectors are subject to ss. 112.313(1)-(8), (10), (12), 442 and (15); 112.3135; and 112.3143(2). For purposes of applying 443 ss. 112.313(1)-(8), (10), (12), and (15); 112.3135; and 444 112.3143(2) to activities of directors, directors are considered 445 public officers and the corporation is considered their agency. 446 Section 11.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 447 made by this act to section 112.3135, Florida Statutes, in a 448 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (4) of section 449 295.21, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 450 295.21âFlorida Is For Veterans, Inc.â 451 (4)âGOVERNANCE.â 452 (d)âThe Legislature finds that it is in the public interest 453 for the members of the board of directors to be subject to the 454 requirements of ss. 112.313, 112.3135, and 112.3143. 455 Notwithstanding the fact that they are not public officers or 456 employees, for purposes of ss. 112.313, 112.3135, and 112.3143, 457 the board members shall be considered to be public officers or 458 employees. In addition to the postemployment restrictions of s. 459 112.313(9), a person appointed to the board of directors may not 460 have direct interest in a contract, franchise, privilege, 461 project, program, or other benefit arising from an award by the 462 corporation during the appointment term and for 2 years after 463 the termination of such appointment. A person who accepts 464 appointment to the board of directors in violation of this 465 subsection, or accepts a direct interest in a contract, 466 franchise, privilege, project, program, or other benefit granted 467 by the corporation to an awardee within 2 years after the 468 termination of his or her service on the board, commits a 469 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 470 775.082 or s. 775.083. Further, each member of the board of 471 directors who is not otherwise required to file financial 472 disclosure under s. 8, Art. II of the State Constitution or s. 473 112.3144 shall file a statement of financial interests under s. 474 112.3145. 475 Section 12.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 476 made by this act to section 112.3135, Florida Statutes, in a 477 reference thereto, paragraph (m) of subsection (5) of section 478 627.311, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 479 627.311âJoint underwriters and joint reinsurers; public 480 records and public meetings exemptions.â 481 (5) 482 (m)âSenior managers and officers, as defined in the plan of 483 operation, and members of the board of governors are subject to 484 the provisions of ss. 112.313, 112.3135, 112.3143, 112.3145, 485 112.316, and 112.317. Senior managers, officers, and board 486 members are also required to file such disclosures with the 487 Commission on Ethics and the Office of Insurance Regulation. The 488 executive director of the plan or his or her designee shall 489 notify each newly appointed and existing appointed member of the 490 board of governors, senior manager, and officer of his or her 491 duty to comply with the reporting requirements of s. 112.3145. 492 At least quarterly, the executive director of the plan or his or 493 her designee shall submit to the Commission on Ethics a list of 494 names of the senior managers, officers, and members of the board 495 of governors who are subject to the public disclosure 496 requirements under s. 112.3145. Notwithstanding s. 112.313, an 497 employee, officer, owner, or director of an insurance agency, 498 insurance company, or other insurance entity may be a member of 499 the board of governors unless such employee, officer, owner, or 500 director of an insurance agency, insurance company, other 501 insurance entity, or an affiliate provides policy issuance, 502 policy administration, underwriting, claims handling, or payroll 503 audit services. Notwithstanding s. 112.3143, such board member 504 may not participate in or vote on a matter if the insurance 505 agency, insurance company, or other insurance entity would 506 obtain a special or unique benefit that would not apply to other 507 similarly situated insurance entities. 508 Section 13.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 509 made by this act to section 112.3135, Florida Statutes, in a 510 reference thereto, subsection (24) of section 1002.33, Florida 511 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 512 1002.33âCharter schools.â 513 (24)âRESTRICTION ON EMPLOYMENT OF RELATIVES.â 514 (a)âThis subsection applies to charter school personnel in 515 a charter school operated by a private entity. As used in this 516 subsection, the term: 517 1.ââCharter school personnelâ means a president, 518 chairperson of the governing board of directors, superintendent, 519 governing board member, principal, assistant principal, or any 520 other person employed by the charter school who has equivalent 521 decisionmaking authority and in whom is vested the authority, or 522 to whom the authority has been delegated, to appoint, employ, 523 promote, or advance individuals or to recommend individuals for 524 appointment, employment, promotion, or advancement in connection 525 with employment in a charter school, including the authority as 526 a member of a governing body of a charter school to vote on the 527 appointment, employment, promotion, or advancement of 528 individuals. 529 2.ââRelativeâ means father, mother, son, daughter, brother, 530 sister, uncle, aunt, first cousin, nephew, niece, husband, wife, 531 father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, 532 brother-in-law, sister-in-law, stepfather, stepmother, stepson, 533 stepdaughter, stepbrother, stepsister, half brother, or half 534 sister. 535 (b)âCharter school personnel may not appoint, employ, 536 promote, or advance, or advocate for appointment, employment, 537 promotion, or advancement, in or to a position in the charter 538 school in which the personnel are serving or over which the 539 personnel exercises jurisdiction or control any individual who 540 is a relative. An individual may not be appointed, employed, 541 promoted, or advanced in or to a position in a charter school if 542 such appointment, employment, promotion, or advancement has been 543 advocated by charter school personnel who serve in or exercise 544 jurisdiction or control over the charter school and who is a 545 relative of the individual or if such appointment, employment, 546 promotion, or advancement is made by the governing board of 547 which a relative of the individual is a member. 548 (c)âThe approval of budgets does not constitute 549 âjurisdiction or controlâ for the purposes of this subsection. 550 551 Charter school personnel in schools operated by a municipality 552 or other public entity are subject to s. 112.3135. 553 Section 14.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 554 made by this act to section 112.3135, Florida Statutes, in a 555 reference thereto, subsection (9) of section 1002.83, Florida 556 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 557 1002.83âEarly learning coalitions.â 558 (9)âEach member of an early learning coalition is subject 559 to ss. 112.313, 112.3135, and 112.3143. For purposes of s. 560 112.3143(3)(a), each voting member is a local public officer who 561 must abstain from voting when a voting conflict exists. 562 Section 15.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 563 made by this act to section 112.3135, Florida Statutes, in a 564 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 1012.23, Florida 565 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 566 1012.23âSchool district personnel policies.â 567 (2)âNeither the district school superintendent nor a 568 district school board member may appoint or employ a relative, 569 as defined in s. 112.3135, to work under the direct supervision 570 of that district school board member or district school 571 superintendent. The limitations of this subsection do not apply 572 to employees appointed or employed before the election or 573 appointment of a school board member or district school 574 superintendent. The Commission on Ethics shall accept and 575 investigate any alleged violations of this section pursuant to 576 the procedures contained in ss. 112.322-112.3241. 577 Section 16.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.